Hawaii statutes.
[§78-18.3] Prohibition on certain increases
in salaries for certain state and county officers or employees. Any law to
the contrary notwithstanding, neither the State nor any of the counties shall
provide or pay to the following state or county officers or employees any
adjustment or increase in the officer's or employee's respective salary or
compensation where such adjustment or increase constitutes a mandatory
adjustment or increase which is, directly or indirectly, dependent upon and
related to negotiated salary adjustments or increases received under collective
bargaining agreements by civil service or other public employees covered by
collective bargaining: any elected or appointed officer or employee in the
executive and judicial branches of state government and the executive branch of
any county government (1) whose salary or compensation is fixed, limited, or
otherwise specified by statute, ordinance, or other legislative enactment
whether or not in express dollar amounts or express dollar amount ceilings; (2)
who is not subject to chapter 76; and (3) who is excluded from collective
bargaining and not subject to chapter 89C. [L 1982, c 129, pt of §34A; gen ch
1985; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Case Notes

Constitutional. 67 H. 412, 689 P.2d 757.

Power of legislature to enact laws of statewide concern not
limited by article VIII, §2 of state constitution; §46-21.5 and this section
not unconstitutional under article VIII, §2 of state constitution as provisions
intended to allow for integrated, equitable, and reasonable salaries among
top-level officers of all jurisdictions was a matter of statewide concern and
thus was a matter within the powers of the legislature. 67 H. 412, 689 P.2d
757.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next